Utah statutes.
31A-23a-101.   Purposes.

The purposes of this chapter include:

(1)  promoting the professional competence of insurance producers, limited line producers, customer service representatives, consultants, managing general agents, and reinsurance intermediaries;

(2)  providing maximum freedom of marketing methods for insurance, consistent with the interests of the Utah public;

(3)  preserving and encouraging competition at the consumer level;

(4)  regulating insurance marketing practices in conformity with the general purposes of this title;

(5)  governing the qualifications and procedures for the licensing of insurance producers, limited line producers, customer service representatives, consultants, managing general agents, and reinsurance intermediaries; and

(6)  promoting uniform licensing requirements between the several states.

